firefox-mte/intl/locales/sv/hyphenation/hyph_sv.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.a4b2
.a3b5i
.ab5ol
.a3bo
.ab3r
.ac3
.a4d
.a3d2r2
.a4d3s
.a5g4ra
.ag2r4
.a5g1re
.a5kl2
.a5le
.al4p2r2
.a3lu
.am4br
.a2m1b2
.am2p3l
.a2m1p
.a5mu
.and4rar
.a2n1d
.an2d2r2
.and1ra
.a2n5es
.a1ne
.ang4er
.a2ng1
.an5g2o
.a4n5s
.a2p1p
.as2k
.a3sket
.as1k2e
.as4t
.a5sten
.as3t2e
.a3s1ti
.a5ta
.a1t
.a2t3t
.au3s2t
.a4val
.a1va
.a2v3s4
.b4
.ba2k5s
.be4n5s
.bil4d3s
.bi2l2d
.bo2k
.bo2r1t1
.cis4
.c2
.cy5klop
.c2y
.cykl2
.d4
.dä2r3
.ek1v4
.e3l4a
.e2l5in
.e1li
.en5s2t
.e4ns
.e4nä
.e2r3i
.e2s
.e5ska1d
.es2k
.es1k2a
.es3kal
.e1s5kap
.es4t
.e5stra1d
.es4t2r4
.es2t1ra
.e3t2r4
.evan5
.e1v
.ex3
.f4
.fe2b3r
.f4e1b2
.fra2m3
.f1ra
.fre4s5
.f1re
.fåge2l3
.få1ge
.fö2r1a
.fö2r1en
.fö1re
.g2
.gu4lä
.g2u
.gus3
.he2m
.hu5sa
.hu2s
.i1b4
.ik4
.i2m3p
.i2n1
.i4na
.i2n3d
.in4ger
.i2ng1
.i2nk2
.i4n3s2
.i2n3t
.is5k2a
.i2sk
.i3so
.k4
.kans4k
.k2a
.ka4ns
.ko5li
.k2o
.kor2t5s
.ko2r1t
.kri2ng3
.k2r4
.krin2g2s2
.kö2p5s
.l2
.lak5r4
.lek5t2r4
.le4k1t
.lu2s2t
.m2
.mas2k2e
.ma5ske1ri
.me4re
.minis4
.mi3n2i
.mjöl2k5s
.mjö2l1k
.mo4n2s
.må4n3s
.må4s4t
.må1s
.män5sk2o
.mä4ns4
.mäns2k
.mörk5r4
.mö2rk
.n4
.ner1
.no4n
.nö2d5r2
.nö2d
.oc3ku
.oc2
.o4ck
.o4k3t
.o1k
.o3kv4
.o2ma
.o2mo
.o4m3s4
.o3mu
.o2n4k4
.o3o
.or4d3s
.o2r2d
.o5s2c2
.o1s4k
.o3sl2
.o3s2t1ra
.os4t2r4
.os2t
.o3s2v2
.o3t2r4
.o1u
.p4
.pap2p5s
.pa2pp
.pa3s3t2e
.pa2s2t
.pa5s1ti
.pi5s1ti
.pis2t
.pre4s2s
.p2r2
.p1re
.pub3li1k2a
.pu2b2
.pub1li
.r2
.re4g2r4
.re1g
.re2s3t2e
.res2t
.ru4ns4
.ry2m2d
.r2y
.rö1ve5
.rö1v
.s4
.sa2k
.seg3r4
.se2g
.si5o
.sjö1
.s2j
.sk4
.skot2t3s
.sk2o
.sko2tt
.s4lu2t3s
.sl2
.s2lu
.s2t4
.sta2m
.s1ta
.ste4n3s
.s3t2e
.st1ri2ng4
.st2r4
.s2tri
.su2p3p
.t4
.ta3b1l
.ta2b2
.ta4k
.tak5l2
.tes3ta
.t2e
.tes2t
.ti2g3r4
.ti1g
.til4l
.t2il
.ti3o
.top2p5s
.t2op
.to2pp
.tre4d2s
.t2r4
.t1re
.tre2d
.tre3s
.tr4ä5k
.u3k
.ul2t5r4
.u4l1t
.ung2e
.u2ng1
.up2
.u4ra
.u2r3s
.u2t1
.u4ta
.u5t4rer
.ut3r4
.ut1re
.u2t5s
.v2
.va2r4t
.vatte2n3
.va1t
.va2tt
.vat3t2e
.ve4d5s
.ve2d
.vä2g
.vä2g3s
.x2
.y2a
.y4e
.å2ng3
.å2r4s5
.å3s4t
.åter1
.å3t2e2
.ä3ro
.ö3ro
a2b2
ab4bu
a4b2b2
a5be
abe2l4s
abe2s
ab1l
ab3la
ab3o2r1t
a3bo
ab5ric2
ab3ri1o
ab4s2c2
a4b3s
ab4sk
a5bu
ac4ke2s
ac2
a4ck
ac3k2e
ac4kis
ac3ki
ack3s2k4
ac2ks
ack3u4p
a5dag
a1d
a3da
a5de1k4
a3d2e
a5del
ad5ep
a2d3j
ad3op
a3do
a5dran
a2d2r2
ad1ra
a3d1re
1a5dres
ad3ril
ad3ru
a4d2s
a5e2d
af4fo
af2
a2f2f2
3af3fä
1af3ri
af4tor
a2ft
af3to
a1ga
ag2a4ra
a1ge
a2ge.
ag1g2r4
a2gg
a2g1l
a2g5o2r2d
a1g2o
ag3ro
ag2r4
a4gur
a1g2u
a4hj
a1h
ai1b4
a3iv
a1j
a3k2a
a4ka2r1t
a5k2e
a1ki
a2k3n
a1k2o
ak5ram
ak2r4
ak1ra
akri5s
ak3ro3b2
ak4s1ta
a2ks
ak1s4t
1akti1g
a4k1t
ak1ti
ak3tri
ak2t2r4
a1ku
a5kva1ri
akv4
ak3ve
a5kår
ak5åt
4akö
a1la
a2l5a2d1m
ala1d
ali2br
a1li
ali1b2
a2lin
a5lin.
a3li1ne
al3i4ns
ali5stik
alis2t
alis1ti
a4lj
al2k3ak
a2l1k
al1k2a
al2kv4
al4kä
all3s2t
al2l1s
al3lå
alms4k
a4l1m
al4ms
a1lo
al5o2r1t
als5pa
a2l1s
al2s2p2
al3t2r4
a4l1t
al4tu4
al4tä
a1lu
alu5s
al2v3s
a2lv
a1l2y
a4maf2
a1ma
a1m4i
am4p2r2
a2m1p
a4m1s
am3åt
a3mö
ana4bo
a1na
ana2b2
a2n3a2l1f2
a2n3a2rk
a2n3c2
an1ci5
an5dak
a2n1d
an3da
ande2l2s
an5d2e
an4dun
an3du
an4dän
a4ne1f2
a1ne
ang4es
a2ng1
an3g2i
an1g2r4
an4i1u4
a1n2i
ank3r4
a2nk
ano2i
a1no
a4no1k
a4nop
an5s1c4e
a4ns
ans2c2
ansis4t
an1s2i
an4s2j
ans5ku
ans2k
ans3li
an2sl2
ans3par
ans2p2
ans1pa
an1s2t
an4sto
an4s4t2y
1ansvar
an1sva
ans2v2
an4t2j
a2n1t
an4t1re
ant2r4
a1nu
a5n2y
a3nö
a1o
a1pe
a2pe.
ape4n3
a1pi
ap4lan
ap2l
apo3s4t2r4
a1po
a3pos
apos2t
1app2a1ra
a2pp
ap1pa
apps4k
ap2ps
ap3ric2
ap2r2
ap3rif2
a5pris
a2p2s
ap3se
ap2s5l2
aps3p2
apu5s
a1pu
a5p2y
a5pä
2a1ra
a4ra2n1n
a4ra2r1v
a3rar
1a2r1b2
4ar3bi
2ar3bo
4arbr
ar3d2r2
a2r2d
ard5s2t
ar4ds
a4re2n1d
a1re
arg5si
a2r1g
ar2g2s
2a2r1h
a1ri
a4rigen
ari1g
ar3k2a
a2rk
ark3lan
arkl2
ar5k2r4
4a2r1l
4arn.
a2r1n
ar4nal4
ar1na
a1ro
a2ro3b2
4a2r1p
ar2sa
a2rs
ar5s2kal
ars1k2a
ar4sk5l2
ar2s2v2
ar4tro
a2r1t
art2r4
arts5p2
ar2ts
ar4tur
4aru
a4rur
a5rus
ar4väg
a2r1v
a3r2y
a3rä
2a1sa
as3be4
a4s1b2
a1s2c2
a2s2h
asis5t
a1si
as3kis
ask4i
a2sk2o
a4sk2r4
as3ku
a2s5l2
as3pa
as2p2
as3pi1g
as2s2k
a4s1s
as2s5op
as1so
as2s2p2
as2s2t
as2s5up
as1su
as3ta
as2t
a5sta2r2d
as5ter
as3t2e
as5tiker
as1ti
asti1k2e
asti5o
as3to
as4t2r4
ast5rak
as2t1ra
a5stral
ast3rol
as5tör
a1stö
a3su
a4sul
a4su2n1d
a2sun
a2s2ut
as3v2
a1s2y
a2s5å
a2sö
a1t
at2a5ra
a1ta
a5t2e
ati5ö
a1ti
a4t2j
a2t2r4
a3tral
a2t1ra
4a4t3rar
a4t3re
at3ri1a
a2tri
a3tric2
at3r2i1e
a5trik
a3tris
a3t4ro
a4tro.
at4s1k2a
a2ts
ats2k
1at3tac2
a2tt
at1ta
at2tak
at4t2j
at4tos
at1to
at2t3s
a4tu2ng1
2au
au5b2
au2t5a
3autom
au1to
au2t5s
2a1va
a4va2r1t
1a2v1g
2a1v4i
a2v3r
4a3vä
a5å
1b2
3ba
ba4di
ba1d
ba4do
ba4d3s4
bak5l2
ba4k2o
ba4ku
bank5l2
ba2nk
bas4ta
bas2t
ba5stu
4b2b2
b4bak
b3ba
b4ba2tt
bba1t
4b4b2b4
bb3l
bb4ler
bb1le
b4b3r
bb4so
b4b3s
4b3d
3be
be3d4r2
be2d
be5e
be1k
4be2l2d
be5lu
be3l2y
be3lå
be5lö
be2ng4
be3nå
be1rö
be1s
be3sl2
be4s5s
be4s1ta
bes2t
be4s3t2e
be5s2u
be3t2r4
be3tv
be3u
4bex1
2b3f2
2b5h
3bi
bi3d4
4bi2n1v
bis3k2o
bi2sk
bi5skv4
b3je
b3k
b5lar
b5la1t
ble4mo
b1le
ble1m
b5len
5ble1ra
3bles
5bli2d
b1li
3blik2r4
3bli2k3s
4b3m
2b3n
3bo
bo4g2r4
bo1g
bo2kl2
bo1k
bo1mu
5bon
bors5t2e
bo2rs
bors2t
bor4ti
bo2r1t
bor2t3r4
bor2ts2
bort3sl2
bo1s
bo4s2c2
bo2y5
4b3p
2b5raf2
b1ra
4b3rar
2b5ra1ti
bra1t
3brik.
b3ri1k2a
3bri1k2e
3bri2k2s
b5ri3kö
bru4s2t
3br2y
3brö
4b3s
b5s1c4e
bs2c2
bs3c1h
b4slan
b2sl2
b4sof2
b1so
b4s2p2
bs2t4
b4st2j
4b3t
3bu
bun4d4s
bu2n1d
bus2s2t
bu4s1s
b3v
3b2y
by5r
3bå
bå2ng3
bå2t2s
3bä
3bö
bö2r2s
c2
5cap
c3c2
1c4e
cens3t
ce4ns
3cen2t2r4
ce2n1t
ceu4s
4ch.
c1h
3ch2au
3che1f2
5c2hoc2
4c2ht
ch4ä4s3
chör4
ch2ö
1ci
ci4lu
cim2
ci2pp4
4ck
c3k2a
c3k2e
c3ki
c4k5j
ck1l2
ck5lis
ck1li
c2k3n
c3k2o
c4k1or2d1n
c1kor
cko2r2d
c3k3o2r1g
c4ko2r1t
ck3r4
ck4re
ck3sla
c2ks
ck2sl2
c3kus2
ck3va
ckv4
ck3ve
ck3vä
ck5ä
ck3ö
cle2a
c1le
co2a
co4m
4cr
cros2
4cs
1c2y
1d
3da
5da.
4da2d2r2
da1d
da2g2s3
2dak
5da1k2o
da3li
5dam
da3må
4dand.
1da2n1d
4d1ap
4d1a2r1b2
4da2r1t
da4t2r4
da1t
da2t5t
4dax1
2d1b2
4dc2
dcen3
d1c4e
2d1d
2d2d1d4
ddi4s
d3di
d3dj
d4dos
d3do
dd3ra
d2d2r2
dd3re
dd3ri
d3drä
d4d2s
dds3v2
3d2e
de1k4
4de1k2o
4de2l2d
del2sa
de2l1s
dels5ti
del2s2t
de5lut
d4en
denti5ö
de2n1t
den1ti
den2to
de3p2r2
d2ep
5der
de2r1k
de2ro
de5rol
der5s1ti
de2rs
ders2t
de4ru
de2s
d2e3se
de3s2p2
des3ti
des2t
d4et
de3t2r4
4dex1
2d1f2
dfö3ra
d3fö
2d1g
d3gl
2d5h
3di
dias4
di1a
di5el
d2i1e
di2g2r4
di1g
di3k2a
di5ku
4di2n1f4
din3g4o
di2ng1
4di2n1r
4di4ns
2dins2p2
4di2n1t
di1o
1di4o2d
di3s2c2
di4s2j
dis3k2o
di2sk
dis1k2r4
di2s3p2
dis5to
dis2t
dis3t1ra
dist2r4
di4t1re
di1t
dit2r4
2dj
d3jor
dj2o
dju2p5p
d2j2u
3d4jur
2d3k2
4d5l
2d1m
2d1n
3do
d2ol
do5lo
4d1o2m1r
dom2sk
do4ms
5don
do4pak
do1pa
4d5o2r2d
4do1ri
4do2r1t
d5os2t
do3y2
2d1p
2d2r2
1d3ra1d
d1ra
3d4rag
1d3ra2n1d
d5r1a2r1b2
d3rar
d5rasse1ra
dr4as
dra4s1s
dras1se
d5ratu
dra1t
3drej
d1re
d3ren
5dres
d3ret
d4ric2
3drif2
d3ri1g
4d5rik
d3rin
3d4riv
d5roc2
3dro2pp
d3ror
4drot
drot2t2s3
dro2tt
d3rä2k3n
dr4äk
3d4rä4k1t
5drän
d3r2ät
1d5rö2d
4ds
d2s1an
d1sa
d2se
ds5e2n1h
d4s1f2
d2si
d2s3i4n1s
d2s2j
dsk2
d3ske1f2
ds1k2e
ds4ken
d3sk4i
d4s3kl2
d4s5k2n
d2s1l2
ds4lot
ds4mo
d2sm
d4små
ds5nå
d2s2n4
d2so
d4s3p2l
ds2p2
d4s3s4
ds3tal
ds2t
ds1ta
d5sta1t2
ds4t2e
d4ste4a
d5sti1g
ds1ti
ds3tin
ds5tro
dst2r4
d2su
ds2v2
d2sö
2d3t
3du
dub3b4le
du2b2
du4b2b2
dubb3l
4dup
du1s
du2s2c2
du4s3t2e
dus2t
du5sö
4dut
du4vu
d2u1v
2d1v
d3v2r
2d3w
3d2y
dy4kan
dy1k2a
dy4ro
4dz
5dåg
2dås
4dåt
4däg
dä2r
3dö
dö4d2s1
1dö2d
4dög
4döp
d5ös2t
dé4
e1a
e2a5k2e
e4am
4e1b2
e2br
eb3ril
4ec2
e3c1h
echi2f2f5
ech2i
echif2
ecis4
e1ci
e3co
e2d
e4da4ns
e3da
ed2d4r2
e2d1d
ed4i4u
e3di
e2d3j
e5dral
e2d2r2
ed1ra
ed1sk2
e4ds
ed2sk2o
ed3s2l2
ed2so4
e3då
e1e
e2e2d
e4ei
ee2k5
e4en.
e4e1ne
e1f2
e2f4s
3ef3t2e
e2ft
e1g
e3ga
e3ge
ege2l
e2g1l
eg2ler
eg1le
e3gle1ra
e5gle1ri
e4gran
eg2r4
eg1ra
eg5ra1t
eg3rin
e5gru
e2g2s3
e5g2å
ei1g2
ei5g1n
e3ik
e1in
ei5s2h
e1i2sk
e1j2o
e3j2u
e3jä
e5jö
e3k2a
e1ki
e1kl2
e2k3la1t
e2k4le
e2k3n
e1k2o
ekor4d5s
e1kor
eko2r2d
e2k3o4r1r
ek4ret.
ek2r4
ek1re
ek5ro
e1ku
e1k2ve
ekv4
ek5vis
ekv4i
e1k2y
e1kä
e1la
el1a4k1t
e2lak
e2l4a2r1b2
3eld.
e2l2d
ele2b3r
e1le
el4e1b2
elek2t3ri
ele4k1t
elek2t2r4
el4f1ra
e2l1f2
eli5ku
e1li
e2l3k4
el3li
el2l3s
el3lä
e1lo
e4lo2b2
el3p
el2si
e2l1s
el5ug
e5l2u1v
2e1lä
e1m
e5ma1t
e1ma
e5mis2
e1mi
emo4n1s
e1mo
em5o2r1t
emp5le
e2m1p
em2p2l
e2n5a2r1t
e1na
e2nav
en4c4e
e2n1c2
e4ne2d
e1ne
e4nek
ene3rö
2e2n1j
en5klo
e2nk
enkl2
en3k2n
en5k2r4
en5kä
enni2ng5
e2n1n
en1n2i
en3nin
ennin2g2s2
eno2m
e1no
en3s2i
e4ns
ens5k2e
ens2k
en2s2m
en2s2p2
ens4t2e
ens2t
ens4vin
ens3v4i
ens2v2
en4så
ent4ha
e2n1t
en2t1h
en2t2r4
ent4rat.
en2t1ra
entra1t
ent3ra1ti
en2t3ri
ent5ru
e5nus
2en2y
2e1nä
e1o
e2o1g
eo4i
e5or
2ep
e1pe
e1pi
e3pla
ep2l
ep5le
ep2p2s3
e2pp
epp1s5t
e1p2r2
e2p3s
ep4t2r4
e2p1t
epu3b2
e1pu
e3på
e2r1ak
e1ra
4er4as
e2r3d4
er2g4l
e2r1g
er4g2u
er4gås
er1g2å
e1ri
e5ri1b2
e4ri2n1f4
erin2g2s3
eri2ng1
eri5stik
eris2t
eris1ti
erk4lin
e2rk
erkl2
erk1li
erlä4
e2r1l
er5na
e2r1n
e1ro
e3ro3b2
e2rom
e2r1p4
er3ra
e4r1r
er5s2c2
e2rs
ers4ken
ers1k2e
er3sl2
er4s4le
er4s1ta
ers2t
er2s4t2e
er3st4r4
er3s2v2
e1ru
e5rum
e3r2y
e5rå1d
e1rä
e2sal
e1sa
es5all
e2s3a2r1m
e1s2c2
2e1se
es4h2i
e2s1h
es4i4u4
e1si
es2k
e4skan
es1k2a
e4s5kar
e4s3ken
es1k2e
es3ker
es5kul
e2sl2
e5slag
es2mi
e2sm
e1s2p2
e4s3p2l
es2s2k
e4s1s
ess5lä
es2s1l2
es2s2t
e3stal
es2t
es1ta
es5ten.
es3t2e
esti2ge
es1ti
esti1g
es3tin
es5tor.
es4t2r4
e1st5rer
est1re
e3stru
est4rö
e3stå
e1s2u
e1s2y
eta3b2
e1ta
e5ti
eti3ö
e1to
e5tri.
et2r4
e2tri
et3ris
e5trä
e2t2s
ets2a1d
et1sa
ets3k2r4
ets2k
et2s1l2
et2s3m
ets5pa
ets2p2
et4s2v2
ett3r4
e2tt
e1tu
etu4ri
et4va
e2tv
et5vu
e1t2y
2e2tz
e1tä
et2äc4
euk4
e5um.
e5up4
4eur
eu4se.
eu3se
eu5t4ro
eut3r4
e1v
e4va2r1m
e4vj
e2v3r
3exp
ex1
ext4r4
4eä
f2
3fa
fac4
fac5k2e
fa4ck
4fa4ns
4f1a2r1b2
fa3s2h
fa4s2t
fa4tö
fa1t
4fav
4f3b2
f3d
3fe
4f2e1f2
fe2l
fes5ta
fes2t
fe3sto
4fex1
2f2f2
2f2f2f4
f1f3l
ff3n
f3fo
ff3r
f2f3s4
f3fä
ffö5re
f3fö
f3g2
f5h
3fi
fi2br
fi1b2
fib5ri1g
fi3li
fin5s4m
fi4ns
fi3s2kal
fi2sk
fis1k2a
fisk3r4
fi2ti
fi1t
2f3k
1fl
flo4da
flo2d
4f3m
f1ma4
1fo
4f2of2
fol2
fo2l1k1
2f5om
fo2na
for4mo
fo2r1m
fos4t3r4
fos2t
4f3p
fra2m
f1ra
fra2m5p
f4rer
f1re
5fre1ri
fre4s
f4ri.
fri5s3p2
5fri1t
fros5ta
fros2t
fru5st2r4
frus2t
från5
2f3s
fs2k
f4sl2
f4sm
f4s2n4
f4s2p2
f4s2t
f4s2v2
2ft
f3ta
f4taf2
f4tak
f4tap
f4ta2r1m
fte4r
f3t2e
f4tex1
f3ti
f4tin
f3to
f4t3r4
ft2sa
f2ts
ft4set
ft3se
ft2s5i
ft4s2j
ft1s4t
fts5vä
fts2v2
f2t5t
f2t1v
3fu
furs5t2e
fu2rs
furs2t
fu5ru
fu3tu
4fv
5f2y
fy4ma
få3tö
1fä
fäs5ti
f4äs
fäs2t
3fö
fö2ra
fö2ren
fö1re
fö2ri
fö2r3k
för3sm
fö2rs
för3su
fö2r1t4
för1ö
ga5br
ga2b2
3g2ag
4ga4k1t
3g2al
gal2l3s
ga5lä
ga4no
2g1a2r1b2
4ga2r1m
ga2ro
4ga2r1t
ga4s2t
ga4su
5g2a1ti
ga1t
gaus4
g2au
g4av
g5av2s2n4
ga2vs
4gax1
2g1b2
2g1d
g3d4r2
ge2a
g4e5b4
2ge1f2
2ge4j
g2e1li
3gelis
gel5s2t
ge2l1s
gel5y
3g2e1lä
gel5än
g4e1m
ge4nap
ge1na
ge2n5g1
3g2e1n2i
3g2e2n1j
4ge2n1m
geno2m5
ge1no
gen4sa
ge4ns
g4en1se
1g2e2n1t
4ge2n1v
g2e5n2y
3g2e1nä
ge2o
1g2e1ra
4ge4r1a2r1b2
ge3rar
3g2e1ri
ger2s5n4
ge2rs
5g2e1se
ge4to
ge2t5s
5g2e2tt
2g1f2
2gg
g1ga
g4gap
g1ge
2g2g5g
g2g1l
g4gos
g1g2o
ggs4la
g2g2s
gg2s1l2
gg2s4m
gg3s4t
gg3s4v2
g4g2u
2g1h
gh4t2e
g2ht
1g2i
gi1o
gi5s3n4
gi4s3t2e
gis2t
gis4t2r4
gi5stral
gis2t1ra
gi5st4ra1t
3giv
gi2ö
g2j2o
3gjor
g3jä
2g3k2
2gl
g4la4ns
g1lar
g2las
5gla1se
g4las5k
5gla2sö
g4li2d
g1li
4glj
g4lög
5g4löm
2g1m
2g1n
g4nag
g1na
g2no
1g2o
3go.
3gol
go4n3s4
4go2n1t
2go2r2d
4go2r1m
4go2r1t
go3sl2
2g1p
g2r4
3graf2
g1ra
5gral
gra2m5
5gra4ns
4gr4as
5g4r4ec2
g1re
5gre2tt
g3ri1g
4g5rik
5grip
3gris
g5ro1i
gro2v
4grum
grus5t
g4rå
5grå.
grä4n
5grä4ns
2g2s
gs1an
g1sa
g5sa2tt
gsa1t
g3sel
g1se
g4s1f2
gsi4d
g1si
g3s4j2u
g1s2j
g5s2kaf2
gs1k2a
gs4k4i
g4s3k2n
g1s4kot
gsk2o
g3s2k2y
g2s1l2
g2s1m
g4s1me
g2s3n4
gs4n2i
gs4nö
gs1or
g1so
g4s3p2l
gs2p2
gs3po
gs4por
g4s5p1re
gsp2r2
gs3pu
g4s3s
gs3tak
gs2t
gs1ta
gs3tal
g3sta2rk
gs4ten
gs3t2e
g3stif2
gs1ti
gs3till
g2st2il
g2s3t2j
g3stol
gs3t1ra
gst2r4
gst4re
g3s4täm
g1stä
g4sug
g1su
gs2v2
g4s3ve
gs3v4i
gs3vå
gs3yt2
gs2y
g1s1ä
2g1t
g3t2r4
1g2u
4gug
gu2l2d3
gul4da
4gu1lä
gu2ma
4gup
gu5ru
gu2s4k
2gut
g3u2t1b4
2g1v
4gw
3g2y
gytt3j
gy2tt
1g2å
går4d2s5
gå2r2d
2g5å1ri
g4äl
g2är
g4ä4s
1g2ö
4gög
gö5ro
2g5ö2r1t
1h
ha3b1l
ha2b2
ha5ge
ha4li
hal4so
ha2l1s
halv3å
ha2lv
ham4s2t
ha4m1s
